Tennessee, session 114, SB2004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-8-111(g), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(g) The responding party shall forward the reimbursable costs with an itemized
invoice to the requesting party as soon as possible, but no later than sixty (60) days after
the provision of assistance has ended. The responding party may make a request to the
requesting party for additional time to forward the itemized invoice for extenuating
circumstances.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2004
011443
- 1 -